Hawaii statutes.
[§142‑3.6] Animal industry special
fund. There is established the animal industry special fund to be
administered by the board of agriculture. Moneys received by the board of
agriculture from:

(1) The use or rental of the division of animal
industry's properties or facilities, including the animal quarantine property
or facilities pursuant to section 142-3.5; or

(2) Appropriations or other moneys made available,

shall be deposited into the special fund. All
interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited in the special fund shall become
part of the special fund. Moneys in the special fund shall be expended to
cover costs of the division of animal industry, including the costs of
salaries, fringe benefits, operating expenses, equipment, motor vehicles,
contract with any qualified person or entity for livestock handling services,
and operating and maintenance of the animal industry facilities; provided that
moneys in the special fund may be used to fund the department's resource
management and planning programs. A reserve shall be maintained in the special
fund to cover contingency costs, including accrued vacation leave, unemployment
insurance, and workers' compensation. [L 2011, c 185, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next